Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 5. Food Stamp Program.

Administrative Code. —

For food stamp program, see 7 AAC 46.

Sec. 47.25.975.
Food stamp program.

The department is authorized to implement the food stamp program.

Householders determined by the department to be eligible for assistance under the food stamp program may obtain food stamp allotments; however, under regulations adopted by the department, a householder may receive all or part of the value of the food stamp allotment in the form of a wage subsidy under AS

47.27.025(e)

if

the householder is a member of a family eligible for the Alaska temporary assistance program under AS 47.27; and

the department determines that the wage subsidy authorized under this subsection would aid the householder in the successful completion of the family self-sufficiency plan under AS

47.27.030

.

Food stamp allotments, other than a wage subsidy authorized under (b) of this section, shall be used to purchase food from retail food stores that have been approved for participation in the food stamp program. Eligible households living in certain remote areas shall be permitted to purchase certain items of hunting and fishing equipment for the purpose of procuring food for the household, except firearms, ammunition, and other explosives, in accordance with regulations that the Secretary of Agriculture adopts.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1965; am § 151 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 9, 10 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For food stamp program, see 7 AAC 46.

Collateral references. —

79 Am. Jur. 2d, Welfare Laws, §§ 27-32.

Sec. 47.25.980.
Duties of department.

The department shall

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the food stamp program;

cooperate with the federal government and do all things necessary to continue state eligibility under the food stamp program;

comply with the requirements of 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036 (Food Stamp Program).

The department may designate and change areas in the state in which the food stamp program shall be carried out.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1965; am § 11 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Administrative Code. —

For food stamp program, see 7 AAC 46.

For hearings, see 7 AAC 49.

Sec. 47.25.983.
Reporting change of status. [Repealed, § 42 ch 143 SLA 1982.]

Sec. 47.25.985.
Violations; penalty.

A person is guilty of a misdemeanor if the person

knowingly acquires, possesses, uses, alters, or transfers food stamp allotments in violation of AS

47.25.975

—

47.25.980

or the regulations adopted under AS

47.25.980

;

presents food stamp allotments or causes them to be presented for payment or redemption knowing them to have been transferred, received, altered, or used in a manner violating AS

47.25.975

— 47.25.980 or the regulations adopted under AS 47.25.980;

knowingly acquires, uses, alters, or transfers a wage subsidy authorized under AS

47.25.975(b)

in violation of AS 47.25.975 — 47.25.980, AS

47.27.025(e)

, or the regulations adopted under AS 47.25.980 or AS

47.27.025(e)

.

Upon conviction a person shall be fined not more than $1,000 or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1965; am § 6 ch 116 SLA 1975; am § 42 ch 143 SLA 1982; am § 12 ch 69 SLA 2002)

Sec. 47.25.990.
Definitions.

In AS

47.25.975

—

47.25.985

,

“department” means Department of Health and Social Services;

“food” means any food or food product for human consumption except alcoholic beverages and tobacco and includes seeds and plants for use in gardens to produce food for the personal consumption of the eligible household;

“food stamp allotments ” means any coupon, stamp, electronic benefit, or type of allotment issued under 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036 (Food Stamp Program);

“food stamp program” means the federal food stamp program authorized by 7 U.S.C. 2011 — 2036.

History.

(§ 1 ch 113 SLA 1965; am § 1 ch 91 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 52 ch 127 SLA 1974; am §§ 13, 14 ch 69 SLA 2002)